District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.17

Construction.

The provisions of this subchapter are intended to protect persons who are exercising First Amendment rights in the District of Columbia, and the standards for police conduct set forth in this subchapter may be relied upon by such persons in any action alleging violations of statutory or common law rights.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 117, 52 DCR 2296